Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-263
General welfare; ordinances to insure; powers; enforcement; penalties; imposition.

A primary city may make all such ordinances, bylaws, rules, and regulations not inconsistent with the general laws of the state as may be necessary or expedient, in addition to the special powers otherwise granted by law, for maintaining the peace, good government, and welfare of the city, its trade, commerce, and manufactories, for preserving order, securing persons or property from violence, danger and destruction, for protecting public and private property, for promoting the public health, safety, convenience, comfort, morals, and general interests and welfare of the inhabitants of the city, and to enforce all ordinances by providing for imprisonment of those convicted of violations thereof at hard labor for a period not to exceed six months and to impose forfeitures, fines, and penalties not exceeding five hundred dollars for any one offense, recoverable with costs, and, in the default of the payment thereof, to provide for confinement in the city prison or county jail, with or without hard labor upon the city streets or elsewhere for the benefit of the city, until the judgment and costs are paid.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, LXIII, p. 143;

R.S.1913, § 4473;

C.S.1922, § 3858;

C.S.1929, § 15-261;

R.S.1943, § 15-263;

Laws 1955, c. 27, § 1, p. 122;

Laws 1965, c. 44, § 2, p. 243.